California, session 20252026, SB801.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 859 of the Labor Code is amended to read:859. For Except for “sheepherders” or “goat herders” as defined in Order No. 14-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission (revised 07-2014), for purposes of this chapter, “employed in an agricultural occupation” has the same meaning as in Order No.14-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission (revised 07-2014).SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation that would require the state to consider any potential cost burden to Californians as it works on achieving its climate goals, including its greenhouse gas emissions goals and standards under the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006.